District of Columbia statutes.
10-832

Method of disposition.

(a)

A property disposed of pursuant to this subchapter shall be disposed of pursuant to a request for proposals (“RFP”) issued by the Mayor.

(b)

A single-household property disposed of pursuant to this subchapter shall be disposed of as part of a bundle of at least 5 properties and not more than 25 properties. A property improved as a multi-household property containing at least 5 single-household dwelling units and no more than 25 single-household dwelling units may be disposed of individually or as part of a bundle of up to 25 properties.

(c)

At least 30% of all single-household dwelling units, irrespective of whether they are single-household dwelling units contained in a multi-household property or in a single-household property, in each bundle of property disposed of pursuant to an RFP, or such greater proportion determined by the Mayor, shall be sold or rented at a price affordable to a household earning 60% or less of the area median income. If the number representing 30% of the single-household dwelling units is not a whole a number, the Mayor may round to the next lower whole number.

(d)

Each property shall be disposed of on an as-is basis.

Apr. 2, 2003, D.C. Law 14-267, § 3, 50 DCR 420
June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-119, § 3(b), 53 DCR 2609
This section is referenced in § 10-835.
D.C. Law 16-119 added subsecs. (c) and (d); and rewrote subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) A property disposed of pursuant to this subchapter shall be disposed of as part of a bundle of at least 5, and not more than 25 properties.”
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Abandoned and Vacant Properties Community Development Disposition, and Disapproval of Disposition of Certain Scattered Vacant and Abandoned Properties Temporary of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-203, October 17, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 10021).